District of Columbia statutes.
31-5051.05

Penalties.

(a)

A vendor shall report any violation of this chapter to the Commissioner within 30 days of discovery of the violation by the vendor.

(b)

If a vendor of portable electronics or its employee or authorized representative violates any provision of this chapter, the Commissioner may:

(1)

After notice and hearing, impose fines not to exceed $2,500 per violation or a $10,000 maximum fine in the aggregate for such conduct; and

(2)

After notice and hearing, impose other penalties that the Commissioner considers necessary and reasonable to carry out the purpose of this chapter, including:

(A)

Suspending the privilege of transacting portable electronics insurance pursuant to this section at specific business locations where violations have occurred; and

(B)

Suspending or revoking the ability of individual employees or authorized representatives to act under the limited lines license.

History

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-306, § 105, 60 DCR 2746